HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 163 N 176
SFX 163 t diň .
SFX 163 t de .
SFX 163 t di .
SFX 163 0 de .
SFX 163 0 den .
SFX 163 t dim .
SFX 163 t dimiň .
SFX 163 t dime .
SFX 163 t dimi .
SFX 163 t dimde .
SFX 163 t dimden .
SFX 163 t diň .
SFX 163 t diňe .
SFX 163 t diňi .
SFX 163 t diňde .
SFX 163 t diňden .
SFX 163 t di .
SFX 163 t diniň .
SFX 163 t dine .
SFX 163 t dini .
SFX 163 t dinde .
SFX 163 t dinden .
SFX 163 t dimiz .
SFX 163 t dimiziň .
SFX 163 t dimize .
SFX 163 t dimizi .
SFX 163 t dimizde .
SFX 163 t dimizden .
SFX 163 t diňiz .
SFX 163 t diňiziň .
SFX 163 t diňize .
SFX 163 t diňizi .
SFX 163 t diňizde .
SFX 163 t diňizden .
SFX 163 0 leri .
SFX 163 0 leriniň .
SFX 163 0 lerine .
SFX 163 0 lerini .
SFX 163 0 lerinde .
SFX 163 0 lerinden .
SFX 163 t didirin .
SFX 163 t disiň .
SFX 163 t didir .
SFX 163 t didiris .
SFX 163 t disiňiz .
SFX 163 t didirler .
SFX 163 t dimdäki .
SFX 163 t dimdäkiniň .
SFX 163 t dimdäkä .
SFX 163 t dimdäkini .
SFX 163 t dimdäkide .
SFX 163 t dimdäkiden .
SFX 163 t diňdäki .
SFX 163 t diňdäkiniň .
SFX 163 t diňdäkä .
SFX 163 t diňdäkini .
SFX 163 t diňdäkide .
SFX 163 t diňdäkiden .
SFX 163 t dindäki .
SFX 163 t dindäkiniň .
SFX 163 t dindäkä .
SFX 163 t dindäkini .
SFX 163 t dindäkide .
SFX 163 t dindäkiden .
SFX 163 t dimizdäki .
SFX 163 t dimizdäkiniň .
SFX 163 t dimizdäkä .
SFX 163 t dimizdäkini .
SFX 163 t dimizdäkide .
SFX 163 t dimizdäkiden .
SFX 163 t diňizdäki .
SFX 163 t diňizdäkiniň .
SFX 163 t diňizdäkä .
SFX 163 t diňizdäkini .
SFX 163 t diňizdäkide .
SFX 163 t diňizdäkiden .
SFX 163 0 lerindäki .
SFX 163 0 lerindäkiniň .
SFX 163 0 lerindäkä .
SFX 163 0 lerindäkini .
SFX 163 0 lerindäkide .
SFX 163 0 lerindäkiden .
SFX 163 0 li .
SFX 163 0 siz .
SFX 163 0 ler .
SFX 163 0 leriň .
SFX 163 0 lere .
SFX 163 0 leri .
SFX 163 0 lerde .
SFX 163 0 lerden .
SFX 163 0 lerdäki .
SFX 163 0 lerdäkiniň .
SFX 163 0 lerdäkä .
SFX 163 0 lerdäkini .
SFX 163 0 lerdäkide .
SFX 163 0 lerdäkiden .
SFX 163 0 lerim .
SFX 163 0 lerimiň .
SFX 163 0 lerime .
SFX 163 0 lerimi .
SFX 163 0 lerimde .
SFX 163 0 lerimden .
SFX 163 0 leriň .
SFX 163 0 leriňiň .
SFX 163 0 leriňe .
SFX 163 0 leriňi .
SFX 163 0 leriňde .
SFX 163 0 leriňden .
SFX 163 0 lerimiz .
SFX 163 0 lerimiziň .
SFX 163 0 lerimize .
SFX 163 0 lerimizi .
SFX 163 0 lerimizde .
SFX 163 0 lerimizden .
SFX 163 0 leriňiz .
SFX 163 0 leriňiziň .
SFX 163 0 leriňize .
SFX 163 0 leriňizi .
SFX 163 0 leriňizde .
SFX 163 0 leriňizden .
SFX 163 0 däki .
SFX 163 0 däkiniň .
SFX 163 0 däkä .
SFX 163 0 däkini .
SFX 163 0 däkide .
SFX 163 0 däkiden .
SFX 163 0 däkiler .
SFX 163 0 däkileriň .
SFX 163 0 däkilere .
SFX 163 0 däkileri .
SFX 163 0 däkilerde .
SFX 163 0 däkilerden .
SFX 163 0 dir .
SFX 163 0 lerdir .
SFX 163 0 digim .
SFX 163 0 digimiň .
SFX 163 0 digime .
SFX 163 0 digimi .
SFX 163 0 digimde .
SFX 163 0 digimden .
SFX 163 0 digiň .
SFX 163 0 digiňiň .
SFX 163 0 digiňe .
SFX 163 0 digiňi .
SFX 163 0 digiňde .
SFX 163 0 digiňden .
SFX 163 0 digi .
SFX 163 0 diginiň .
SFX 163 0 digine .
SFX 163 0 digini .
SFX 163 0 diginde .
SFX 163 0 diginden .
SFX 163 0 digimiz .
SFX 163 0 digimiziň .
SFX 163 0 digimize .
SFX 163 0 digimizi .
SFX 163 0 digimizde .
SFX 163 0 digimizden .
SFX 163 0 digiňiz .
SFX 163 0 digiňiziň .
SFX 163 0 digiňize .
SFX 163 0 digiňizi .
SFX 163 0 digiňizde .
SFX 163 0 digiňizden .
SFX 163 0 dikleri .
SFX 163 0 dikleriniň .
SFX 163 0 diklerine .
SFX 163 0 diklerini .
SFX 163 0 diklerinde .
SFX 163 0 diklerinden .
SFX 163 0 lik .
SFX 163 0 ligiň .
SFX 163 0 lige .
SFX 163 0 ligi .
SFX 163 0 likde .
SFX 163 0 likden .

SFX 164 N 176
SFX 164 ç jiň .
SFX 164 ç je .
SFX 164 ç ji .
SFX 164 0 de .
SFX 164 0 den .
SFX 164 ç jim .
SFX 164 ç jimiň .
SFX 164 ç jime .
SFX 164 ç jimi .
SFX 164 ç jimde .
SFX 164 ç jimden .
SFX 164 ç jiň .
SFX 164 ç jiňe .
SFX 164 ç jiňi .
SFX 164 ç jiňde .
SFX 164 ç jiňden .
SFX 164 ç ji .
SFX 164 ç jiniň .
SFX 164 ç jine .
SFX 164 ç jini .
SFX 164 ç jinde .
SFX 164 ç jinden .
SFX 164 ç jimiz .
SFX 164 ç jimiziň .
SFX 164 ç jimize .
SFX 164 ç jimizi .
SFX 164 ç jimizde .
SFX 164 ç jimizden .
SFX 164 ç jiňiz .
SFX 164 ç jiňiziň .
SFX 164 ç jiňize .
SFX 164 ç jiňizi .
SFX 164 ç jiňizde .
SFX 164 ç jiňizden .
SFX 164 0 leri .
SFX 164 0 leriniň .
SFX 164 0 lerine .
SFX 164 0 lerini .
SFX 164 0 lerinde .
SFX 164 0 lerinden .
SFX 164 ç jidirin .
SFX 164 ç jisiň .
SFX 164 ç jidir .
SFX 164 ç jidiris .
SFX 164 ç jisiňiz .
SFX 164 ç jidirler .
SFX 164 ç jimdäki .
SFX 164 ç jimdäkiniň .
SFX 164 ç jimdäkä .
SFX 164 ç jimdäkini .
SFX 164 ç jimdäkide .
SFX 164 ç jimdäkiden .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäki .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäkiniň .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäkä .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäkini .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäkide .
SFX 164 ç jiňdäkiden .
SFX 164 ç jindäki .
SFX 164 ç jindäkiniň .
SFX 164 ç jindäkä .
SFX 164 ç jindäkini .
SFX 164 ç jindäkide .
SFX 164 ç jindäkiden .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäki .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäkiniň .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäkä .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäkini .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäkide .
SFX 164 ç jimizdäkiden .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäki .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäkiniň .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäkä .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäkini .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäkide .
SFX 164 ç jiňizdäkiden .
SFX 164 0 lerindäki .
SFX 164 0 lerindäkiniň .
SFX 164 0 lerindäkä .
SFX 164 0 lerindäkini .
SFX 164 0 lerindäkide .
SFX 164 0 lerindäkiden .
SFX 164 0 li .
SFX 164 0 siz .
SFX 164 0 ler .
SFX 164 0 leriň .
SFX 164 0 lere .
SFX 164 0 leri .
SFX 164 0 lerde .
SFX 164 0 lerden .
SFX 164 0 lerdäki .
SFX 164 0 lerdäkiniň .
SFX 164 0 lerdäkä .
SFX 164 0 lerdäkini .
SFX 164 0 lerdäkide .
SFX 164 0 lerdäkiden .
SFX 164 0 lerim .
SFX 164 0 lerimiň .
SFX 164 0 lerime .
SFX 164 0 lerimi .
SFX 164 0 lerimde .
SFX 164 0 lerimden .
SFX 164 0 leriň .
SFX 164 0 leriňiň .
SFX 164 0 leriňe .
SFX 164 0 leriňi .
SFX 164 0 leriňde .
SFX 164 0 leriňden .
SFX 164 0 lerimiz .
SFX 164 0 lerimiziň .
SFX 164 0 lerimize .
SFX 164 0 lerimizi .
SFX 164 0 lerimizde .
SFX 164 0 lerimizden .
SFX 164 0 leriňiz .
SFX 164 0 leriňiziň .
SFX 164 0 leriňize .
SFX 164 0 leriňizi .
SFX 164 0 leriňizde .
SFX 164 0 leriňizden .
SFX 164 0 däki .
SFX 164 0 däkiniň .
SFX 164 0 däkä .
SFX 164 0 däkini .
SFX 164 0 däkide .
SFX 164 0 däkiden .
SFX 164 0 däkiler .
SFX 164 0 däkileriň .
SFX 164 0 däkilere .
SFX 164 0 däkileri .
SFX 164 0 däkilerde .
SFX 164 0 däkilerden .
SFX 164 0 dir .
SFX 164 0 lerdir .
SFX 164 0 digim .
SFX 164 0 digimiň .
SFX 164 0 digime .
SFX 164 0 digimi .
SFX 164 0 digimde .
SFX 164 0 digimden .
SFX 164 0 digiň .
SFX 164 0 digiňiň .
SFX 164 0 digiňe .
SFX 164 0 digiňi .
SFX 164 0 digiňde .
SFX 164 0 digiňden .
SFX 164 0 digi .
SFX 164 0 diginiň .
SFX 164 0 digine .
SFX 164 0 digini .
SFX 164 0 diginde .
SFX 164 0 diginden .
SFX 164 0 digimiz .
SFX 164 0 digimiziň .
SFX 164 0 digimize .
SFX 164 0 digimizi .
SFX 164 0 digimizde .
SFX 164 0 digimizden .
SFX 164 0 digiňiz .
SFX 164 0 digiňiziň .
SFX 164 0 digiňize .
SFX 164 0 digiňizi .
SFX 164 0 digiňizde .
SFX 164 0 digiňizden .
SFX 164 0 dikleri .
SFX 164 0 dikleriniň .
SFX 164 0 diklerine .
SFX 164 0 diklerini .
SFX 164 0 diklerinde .
SFX 164 0 diklerinden .
SFX 164 0 lik .
SFX 164 0 ligiň .
SFX 164 0 lige .
SFX 164 0 ligi .
SFX 164 0 likde .
SFX 164 0 likden .
