HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
adampisint/163
agatpisint/163
akmuhammet/163
alyhezret/163
apatit/163
bazbent/163
bedähet/163
begenç/164
behişt/163
bejit/163
beket/163
belent/163
belet/163
bent/163
bereket/163
bermit/163
bähbit/163
bibereket/163
bilet/163
bilgiç/164
birikdirgiç/164
bisähet/163
biweç/164
bökdenç/164
börtmeç/164
böwet/163
bufet/163
bürgüt/163
çekiç/164
çäç/164
çigit/163
çöket/163
çöküt/163
çözgüt/163
deňeç/164
derbent/163
dert/163
dikeç/164
döwülgiç/164
dürtgüç/164
düşewünt/163
düşgüç/164
ebşit/163
edrenç/164
eglenç/164
eklenç/164
elhenç/164
elsüpürgiç/164
eňňit/163
erbet/163
erkeç/164
eşitgiç/164
eýmenç/164
äginç/164
ägirt/163
äht/163
äjit-mäjit/163
ämert/163
änewüç/164
äpet/163
äpet-äpet/163
ät/163
geçit/163
genç/164
gert/163
gerýit/163
gezelenç/164
giç/164
göhert/163
gönenç/164
göreç/164
görkezgiç/164
göweç/164
göwüsbent/163
gumsalt/163
gülebent/163
gülkünç/164
güňleç/164
hebent/163
hekleç/164
hiç/164
hünärment/163
hyýalbent/163
içit/163
igenç/164
ikilenç/164
ildirgiç/164
ilginç/164
ir-giç/164
iru-giç/164
jerhet/163
jeset/163
jet/163
jezit/163
jäç/164
jähet/163
jäht/163
jigerbent/163
jigit/163
jilt/163
jübüt/163
kalp/163
keç/164
kekeç/164
kement/163
kent/163
kerleç/164
kerpiç/164
keselbent/163
kesgit/163
käýinç/164
kilt/163
kömeç/164
köneürgenç/164
köplenç/164
köreleç/164
körpeç/164
köseleç/164
köýmet/163
kükürt/163
kümüşleç/164
küýsenç/164
lapykeç/164
leç/164
lenç/164
leňňeç/164
meňzeç/164
mert/163
metjit/163
meýit/163
mätäç/164
möhüt/163
möwrit/163
muhammet/163
mülhit/163
mürehet/163
mürit/163
mürrewwet/163
nert/163
neşebent/163
näbelet/163
nälet/163
näteňet/163
nöwert/163
nurmuhammet/163
oguzkent/163
orsýet/163
öçürgiç/164
ökünç/164
ölçüt/163
örküç/164
ötünç/164
öweç/164
öwüç/164
öwüt/163
pagbent/163
paket/163
paraliç/164
partbilet/163
peç/164
pedernälet/163
peläket/163
pent/163
perzent/163
pete-pet/163
peýwent/163
pisint/163
pürkgüç/164
reagent/163
referent/163
reglament/163
reksit/163
renç/164
ret/163
ruhubelent/163
saz-söhbet/163
sebet/163
senet/163
sepgit/163
serhet/163
serkeç/164
seýit/163
sähet/163
sögünç/164
söhbet/163
söwüt/163
söýget/163
söýünç/164
sustubelent/163
süpürgiç/164
sürgüç/164
sürteç/164
sürtgüç/164
süýpent/163
süýrgült/163
süýtleňňiç/164
süzgüç/164
şehit/163
şerbet/163
şägirt/163
şäht/163
şöwket/163
tebit/163
tegmilt/163
tepbet/163
täç/164
täret/163
tohum-tiç/164
töhmet/163
ülpet/163
ürgenç/164
weç/164
ýagpisint/163
ýezit/163
ýigit/163
ýigrenç/164
ýolbelet/163
ýüregedüşgünç/164
ýüzgüç/164
ýygrenç/164
zeýrenç/164
ziňňirt/163
berdimuhamet/163
döwletmämmet/163
